Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1702
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 37-1703 to 37-1716 are used.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 3.